District of Columbia statutes.
29-802.02

Amendment or restatement of certificate of organization.

(a)

A certificate of organization may be amended or restated at any time.

(b)

To amend its certificate of organization, a limited liability company shall deliver to the Mayor for filing an amendment stating:

(1)

The name of the company;

(2)

The date of filing of its initial certificate of organization; and

(3)

The changes the amendment makes to the certificate as most recently amended or restated.

(c)

To restate its certificate of organization, a limited liability company shall deliver to the Mayor for filing a restatement, designated as such in its heading.

(d)

If a member of a member-managed limited liability company, or a manager of a manager-managed limited liability company, knows that any information in a filed certificate of organization was inaccurate when the certificate was filed or has become inaccurate owing to changed circumstances, the member or manager shall promptly:

(1)

Cause the certificate to be amended; or

(2)

If appropriate, deliver to the Mayor for filing a statement of change under §§ 29-104.07 through 29-104.10 or a statement of correction under § 29-102.05.

(e)

A limited liability company may amend its certificate of organization to delete the information required by § 29-802.01(b)(2) at any time after it has filed its first biennial report under § 29-102.11.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(3)(B), 59 DCR 13171

History

This section is referenced in § 29-802.05.

Section References

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “initial certificate” for “certificate” in (b)(2); deleted “stating” following “heading” at the end of (c) and substituted a closing period for the semicolon; repealed (c)(1) through (c)(3); repealed (d), which read: “Subject to §§ 29-801.09(c) and 29-802.05(c), an amendment to or restatement of a certificate of organization shall be effective when filed by the Mayor.”; and redesignated former (e) and (f) as (d) and (e), respectively.

Effect of Amendments

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 202 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.